Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.200

Public stadium authority—Confidentiality of financial information.

The public stadium authority may refuse to disclose financial information on the master tenant, concessioners, the team affiliate, or subleasee under RCW 42.56.270.

[ 2005 c 274 s 274; 1997 c 220 s 119 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]